spa/src/Lexicon.lexc
LEXICON JRoot
(-crátic)	Jo;
(-linguis)	Jzero;
(-mer)	Jo;
(-és)	Jzero;
(Babel)	Jzero;
(Batist)	Ja;
(Chiquimul)	Ja;
(Coinc)	Jo;
(Coltauc)	Jo;
(Copérnic)	Jo;
(Curanip)	Je;
(Escuintl)	Ja;
(Euclides)	Jzero;
(Fulan)	Jo;
(Hualañé)	Jzero;
(LGBT)	Jzero;
(Licantén)	Jzero;
(Morazán)	Jzero;
(PRD)	Jzero;
(Paredones)	Jzero;
(Pelluhu)	Je;
(Pinochet)	Jzero;
(Rauc)	Jo;
(Romeral)	Jzero;
(Saf)	Jo;
(Sporting)	Jzero;
(Titán)	Jzero;
(Vichuquén)	Jzero;
(abdicativ)	Jo;
(abdominal)	Jzero;
(abemolad)	Jo;
(abiert)	Jo;
(abnegad)	Jo;
(abominabl)	Je;
(abrupt)	Jo;
(absolut)	Jo;
(abstinent)	Je;
(abstract)	Jo;
(absurd)	Jo;
(abusad)	Jo;
(abusiv)	Jo;
(abyect)	Jo;
(acababl)	Je;
(acabad)	Jo;
(académic)	Ja;
(académic)	Jo;
(acanalad)	Jo;
(accesibl)	Je;
(accidentad)	Jo;
(accidental)	Jzero;
(aced)	Jo;
(acentuad)	Jo;
(aceptabl)	Je;
(acerb)	Jo;
(acomedid)	Jo;
(aconfesional)	Jzero;
(acordad)	Jo;
(acordant)	Je;
(acostad)	Jo;
(acostumbrad)	Jo;
(acotiledón)	Jzero;
(acr)	Je;
(activ)	Jo;
(actoral)	Jzero;
(actual)	Jzero;
(actuos)	Jo;
(acumulador)	Jzero;
(acurad)	Jo;
(acuátic)	Jo;
(acéfal)	Jo;
(acérrim)	Jo;
(acétic)	Jo;
(acústic)	Jo;
(adaptad)	Ja;
(adaptad)	Jo;
(adaxial)	Jzero;
(adecuad)	Ja;
(adelantad)	Ja;
(adelantad)	Jo;
(adequad)	Jo;
(adict)	Jo;
(adipos)	Jo;
(adjetiv)	Jo;
(adjunt)	Jo;
(administrador)	Jzero;
(administrativ)	Jo;
(admirabl)	Je;
(admirativ)	Jo;
(adolescent)	Je;
(adoptabl)	Je;
(adorabl)	Je;
(adrenal)	Jzero;
(adult)	Jo;
(adust)	Jo;
(adverbial)	Jzero;
(advers)	Jo;
(adyuvant)	Je;
(aerobi)	Jo;
(afabl)	Je;
(afect)	Jo;
(afectiv)	Jo;
(aferent)	Je;
(afirmativ)	Jo;
(aflict)	Jo;
(afligid)	Jo;
(afluent)	Je;
(afortunad)	Jo;
(afrancesad)	Jo;
(african)	Jo;
(afín)	Jzero;
(agencial)	Jzero;
(agent)	Je;
(agnóstic)	Jo;
(agonístic)	Jo;
(agr)	Je;
(agr)	Jo;
(agraciad)	Jo;
(agrari)	Jo;
(agregant)	Je;
(agrest)	Je;
(agri)	Jo;
(agripad)	Jo;
(agrícol)	Ja;
(agud)	Jo;
(agónic)	Jo;
(ahorrad)	Jo;
(ajen)	Jo;
(alantoides)	Jzero;
(alargad)	Jo;
(alatinad)	Jo;
(alb)	Jo;
(alcalizad)	Jo;
(alcanzad)	Jo;
(aleatori)	Jo;
(alegr)	Je;
(alemán)	Jzero;
(alergi)	Ja;
(alert)	Ja;
(alev)	Je;
(alienígen)	Jo;
(alimentari)	Jo;
(almadí)	Ja;
(alpin)	Jo;
(alt)	Jo;
(altaner)	Jo;
(alternativ)	Jo;
(altimétric)	Jo;
(altisonant)	Je;
(altitudinal)	Jzero;
(amabl)	Je;
(amad)	Jo;
(amar)	Jzero;
(amarg)	Jo;
(amarill)	Jo;
(amarrad)	Jo;
(ambient)	Je;
(ambigu)	Ja;
(ambigu)	Jo;
(ambulativ)	Jo;
(amen)	Jo;
(amig)	Jo;
(amiloid)	Je;
(amniot)	Ja;
(amoni)	Jo;
(amorf)	Jo;
(ampelografí)	Ja;
(ampli)	Jo;
(analític)	Jo;
(analógic)	Jo;
(ancestral)	Jzero;
(anch)	Jo;
(anchov)	Ja;
(ancian)	Ja;
(ancian)	Jo;
(andorr)	Ja;
(andrógin)	Jo;
(anej)	Jo;
(anex)	Jo;
(anfractuos)	Jo;
(angelical)	Jzero;
(angl)	Jo;
(angost)	Jo;
(angulos)	Jo;
(anill)	Ja;
(animad)	Jo;
(animador)	Jzero;
(anormal)	Jzero;
(ansios)	Jo;
(antagonist)	Ja;
(antecedent)	Je;
(anterior)	Jzero;
(antier)	Jzero;
(antigu)	Jo;
(antipolític)	Jo;
(antojad)	Jo;
(antropomorf)	Jo;
(antrors)	Jo;
(antónim)	Jo;
(anu)	Jo;
(anual)	Jzero;
(anular)	Jzero;
(análog)	Ja;
(anómal)	Jo;
(anónim)	Jo;
(apacibl)	Je;
(aparent)	Je;
(apeabl)	Je;
(apetent)	Je;
(apical)	Jzero;
(aplazabl)	Je;
(apocalíptic)	Jo;
(apodíctic)	Jo;
(apostad)	Jo;
(apostólic)	Jo;
(aprensibl)	Je;
(aprensiv)	Jo;
(apropiabl)	Je;
(aproximad)	Ja;
(apt)	Jo;
(apuest)	Ja;
(apuest)	Jo;
(apurad)	Jo;
(apócrif)	Jo;
(aquiescent)	Je;
(aracnoide)	Jo;
(arbitrari)	Jo;
(arcan)	Jo;
(ardient)	Je;
(ardu)	Jo;
(argent)	Jo;
(aristocrátic)	Jo;
(aritmétic)	Jo;
(armad)	Jo;
(arqueológic)	Jo;
(arrebatad)	Ja;
(arrian)	Jo;
(artes)	Ja;
(articulabl)	Je;
(articular)	Jzero;
(ascendent)	Je;
(asegurad)	Jo;
(asequibl)	Je;
(asesin)	Jo;
(asidu)	Jo;
(asiátic)	Jo;
(aspirad)	Jo;
(asqueros)	Jo;
(astad)	Jo;
(astronómic)	Jo;
(astros)	Jo;
(astut)	Jo;
(ate)	Jo;
(atent)	Jo;
(atlántic)	Jo;
(atolondrad)	Ja;
(atractiv)	Jo;
(atroz)	Jzero;
(atrás)	Jzero;
(audaz)	Jzero;
(audibl)	Je;
(august)	Jo;
(ausent)	Je;
(auster)	Jo;
(automóvil)	Jzero;
(auténtic)	Jo;
(autógraf)	Jo;
(autónom)	Jo;
(autótrof)	Jo;
(avar)	Jo;
(avizor)	Jzero;
(axial)	Jzero;
(ayun)	Jo;
(azorad)	Jo;
(azul)	Jzero;
(azulgran)	Ja;
(azur)	Jzero;
(aére)	Jo;
(añ)	Ja;
(añej)	Jo;
(bab)	Ja;
(baj)	Jo;
(balneari)	Jo;
(banal)	Jzero;
(banc)	Jo;
(bancal)	Jzero;
(barroc)	Jo;
(bastant)	Je;
(bastard)	Jo;
(beat)	Jo;
(beatífic)	Jo;
(bebé)	Jzero;
(beguin)	Jo;
(belicos)	Jo;
(bell)	Jo;
(bellac)	Jo;
(benevolent)	Je;
(benign)	Jo;
(benévol)	Jo;
(beod)	Jo;
(bermej)	Jo;
(berrinch)	Je;
(bestial)	Jzero;
(bienal)	Jzero;
(bienhechor)	Jzero;
(bienintencionad)	Jo;
(bilbain)	Jo;
(biliar)	Jzero;
(bilingü)	Je;
(bilios)	Jo;
(binari)	Jo;
(bis)	Jzero;
(bizarr)	Jo;
(bizc)	Jo;
(biótic)	Jo;
(blanc)	Jo;
(bland)	Jo;
(blasfem)	Jo;
(blástic)	Jo;
(bob)	Jo;
(bolcheviqu)	Je;
(boll)	Jo;
(bombach)	Jo;
(bonit)	Jo;
(bordoner)	Jo;
(borrach)	Jo;
(borrad)	Jo;
(bot)	Jo;
(braquial)	Jzero;
(brav)	Jo;
(brev)	Je;
(británic)	Jo;
(bromit)	Jo;
(bronc)	Jo;
(brusc)	Jo;
(brut)	Jo;
(brutal)	Jzero;
(buen)	Jo;
(burd)	Jo;
(burocrátic)	Jo;
(bárbar)	Jo;
(báric)	Jo;
(básquet)	Jzero;
(bélic)	Jo;
(bígam)	Jo;
(cabizbaj)	Jo;
(cachond)	Jo;
(cachud)	Jo;
(caduc)	Jo;
(caducifoli)	Jo;
(caid)	Ja;
(cajet)	Je;
(calamitos)	Jo;
(calcinosis)	Jzero;
(calient)	Je;
(calificad)	Jo;
(calm)	Jo;
(caloros)	Jo;
(calv)	Jo;
(cambiari)	Jo;
(cameral)	Jzero;
(caminabl)	Je;
(campanud)	Jo;
(can)	Jo;
(cancelad)	Jo;
(cancerologí)	Ja;
(canin)	Jo;
(canos)	Jo;
(caníbal)	Jzero;
(canónic)	Jo;
(capaz)	Jzero;
(capilar)	Jzero;
(capital)	Jzero;
(capitular)	Jzero;
(capuch)	Jo;
(car)	Jo;
(característic)	Jo;
(cardenal)	Jzero;
(caritativ)	Jo;
(carnicer)	Jo;
(carrocer)	Jo;
(cartuch)	Jo;
(casc)	Jo;
(caset)	Je;
(cast)	Jo;
(castellan)	Jo;
(castigad)	Jo;
(casual)	Jzero;
(catalán)	Jzero;
(categóric)	Jo;
(catet)	Je;
(católic)	Jo;
(caudal)	Jzero;
(causal)	Jzero;
(caut)	Jo;
(cautiv)	Jo;
(cautivad)	Jo;
(cavilos)	Jo;
(cazurr)	Jo;
(caíd)	Jo;
(caótic)	Jo;
(cefálic)	Jo;
(celebrad)	Jo;
(celestial)	Jzero;
(celt)	Ja;
(celíac)	Jo;
(cenozoic)	Jo;
(centenari)	Jo;
(central)	Jzero;
(centrífug)	Ja;
(centrífug)	Jo;
(ceremonios)	Jo;
(cervat)	Jo;
(ceñ)	Jo;
(chabacan)	Jo;
(chachi)	Jzero;
(chanch)	Jo;
(chaparr)	Jo;
(charr)	Jo;
(charrán)	Jzero;
(chat)	Jo;
(chatarr)	Ja;
(chav)	Jo;
(chec)	Jo;
(chel)	Je;
(chic)	Jo;
(chilang)	Jo;
(chillón)	Jzero;
(chilot)	Je;
(chiv)	Jo;
(choch)	Jo;
(chol)	Jo;
(chorl)	Jo;
(chuec)	Jo;
(chul)	Jo;
(cian)	Jzero;
(cibernétic)	Jo;
(cieg)	Jo;
(cient)	Je;
(científic)	Ja;
(científic)	Jo;
(ciert)	Jo;
(ciguat)	Jo;
(ciliar)	Jzero;
(cimarrón)	Jzero;
(cinétic)	Jo;
(circular)	Jzero;
(cismátic)	Jo;
(citoquímic)	Jo;
(civil)	Jzero;
(civilizad)	Jo;
(ciátic)	Jo;
(clamos)	Jo;
(clandestin)	Jo;
(clar)	Jo;
(clarivident)	Je;
(clavicular)	Jzero;
(clerical)	Jzero;
(clonal)	Jzero;
(cloroacétic)	Jo;
(cloroquin)	Ja;
(clásic)	Ja;
(clásic)	Jo;
(clínic)	Jo;
(coactiv)	Jo;
(coaxial)	Jzero;
(cobard)	Je;
(cociner)	Jo;
(coclear)	Jzero;
(coercitiv)	Jo;
(coetáne)	Jo;
(cognitiv)	Jo;
(coherent)	Je;
(cohesiv)	Jo;
(coilocit)	Jo;
(coincident)	Je;
(coj)	Jo;
(colaborativ)	Jo;
(colad)	Jo;
(colateral)	Jzero;
(colectiv)	Jo;
(colector)	Jzero;
(colegiad)	Jo;
(colgad)	Jo;
(colineal)	Jzero;
(colinérgic)	Jo;
(colmad)	Jo;
(colágen)	Jo;
(combust)	Jo;
(comedid)	Jo;
(comensal)	Jzero;
(comercial)	Jzero;
(comestibl)	Je;
(comisionad)	Jo;
(compact)	Jo;
(comparabl)	Je;
(comparativ)	Jo;
(compasad)	Jo;
(compasiv)	Jo;
(compatibl)	Je;
(compendios)	Jo;
(competent)	Je;
(competidor)	Jzero;
(complej)	Jo;
(complet)	Jo;
(complicad)	Jo;
(componibl)	Je;
(comportabl)	Je;
(compositiv)	Jo;
(comprensibl)	Je;
(comprensiv)	Jo;
(compresibl)	Je;
(compresor)	Jzero;
(comprobabl)	Je;
(comprometid)	Jo;
(compuest)	Jo;
(compulsiv)	Jo;
(compungid)	Jo;
(comunal)	Jzero;
(comunicacional)	Jzero;
(comunicativ)	Jo;
(comunist)	Ja;
(comunitari)	Jo;
(común)	Jzero;
(conceptualizabl)	Je;
(conceptuos)	Jo;
(concesional)	Jzero;
(concienzud)	Jo;
(conciliabl)	Je;
(concis)	Jo;
(conclus)	Jo;
(conclusiv)	Jo;
(concluyent)	Je;
(concomitant)	Je;
(concord)	Je;
(concordant)	Je;
(concret)	Jo;
(concurrent)	Je;
(concurrid)	Jo;
(concéntric)	Jo;
(condicional)	Jzero;
(condral)	Jzero;
(conducent)	Je;
(conductiv)	Jo;
(conductual)	Jzero;
(condíle)	Jo;
(conex)	Jo;
(confes)	Jo;
(confesabl)	Je;

LEXICON Prefixes
a-	JRoot;
ab-	JRoot;
adreno-	JRoot;
aero-	JRoot;
afro-	JRoot;
agro-	JRoot;
ali-	JRoot;
an-	JRoot;
ana-	JRoot;
anarco-	JRoot;
andro-	JRoot;
anfi-	JRoot;
angio-	JRoot;
anglo-	JRoot;
ante-	JRoot;
antero-	JRoot;
anti-	JRoot;
antropo-	JRoot;
aortico-	JRoot;
archi-	JRoot;
arqueo-	JRoot;
arqui-	JRoot;
astragalo-	JRoot;
astro-	JRoot;
audio-	JRoot;
auri-	JRoot;
auriculo-	JRoot;
austro-	JRoot;
auto-	JRoot;
bi-	JRoot;
bio-	JRoot;
braquio-	JRoot;
calcaneo-	JRoot;
calloso-	JRoot;
cardio-	JRoot;
cefalo-	JRoot;
cerebro-	JRoot;
cervico-	JRoot;
ciber-	JRoot;
circun-	JRoot;
cito-	JRoot;
clepto-	JRoot;
co-	JRoot;
colo-	JRoot;
condro-	JRoot;
contra-	JRoot;
coraco-	JRoot;
costo-	JRoot;
crono-	JRoot;
cuadri-	JRoot;
cuatri-	JRoot;
cuneo-	JRoot;
denti-	JRoot;
dermo-	JRoot;
des-	JRoot;
di-	JRoot;
diplo-	JRoot;
dis-	JRoot;
dorso-	JRoot;
eco-	JRoot;
ecto-	JRoot;
electro-	JRoot;
en-	JRoot;
endo-	JRoot;
ento-	JRoot;
entre-	JRoot;
epi-	JRoot;
es-	JRoot;
esfeno-	JRoot;
espleno-	JRoot;
esquizo-	JRoot;
estereo-	JRoot;
esterno-	JRoot;
estilo-	JRoot;
etno-	JRoot;
euro-	JRoot;
ex-	JRoot;
extra-	JRoot;
femoro-	JRoot;
ferro-	JRoot;
fibro-	JRoot;
fito-	JRoot;
foto-	JRoot;
franco-	JRoot;
fronto-	JRoot;
gastro-	JRoot;
genito-	JRoot;
geo-	JRoot;
gleno-	JRoot;
gloso-	JRoot;
greco-	JRoot;
helio-	JRoot;
hemato-	JRoot;
hepato-	JRoot;
hetero-	JRoot;
hexa-	JRoot;
hidro-	JRoot;
hiper-	JRoot;
hipo-	JRoot;
hispano-	JRoot;
homo-	JRoot;
humero-	JRoot;
i-	JRoot;
idem-	JRoot;
ileo-	JRoot;
ilio-	JRoot;
im-	JRoot;
in-	JRoot;
infero-	JRoot;
infra-	JRoot;
inmuno-	JRoot;
inter-	JRoot;
intra-	JRoot;
ir-	JRoot;
iso-	JRoot;
isquio-	JRoot;
judeo-	JRoot;
lenticulo-	JRoot;
linfo-	JRoot;
lumbo-	JRoot;
luso-	JRoot;
macro-	JRoot;
mal-	JRoot;
mega-	JRoot;
menisco-	JRoot;
meso-	JRoot;
meta-	JRoot;
micro-	JRoot;
mielo-	JRoot;
mono-	JRoot;
muco-	JRoot;
multi-	JRoot;
musculo-	JRoot;
narco-	JRoot;
naso-	JRoot;
neo-	JRoot;
neuro-	JRoot;
nivo-	JRoot;
nor-	JRoot;
occipito-	JRoot;
oculo-	JRoot;
oligo-	JRoot;
omni-	JRoot;
omo-	JRoot;
orbito-	JRoot;
oro-	JRoot;
osteo-	JRoot;
paleo-	JRoot;
pan-	JRoot;
para-	JRoot;
parieto-	JRoot;
penta-	JRoot;
per-	JRoot;
peri-	JRoot;
pluri-	JRoot;
poli-	JRoot;
pos-	JRoot;
post-	JRoot;
postero-	JRoot;
pre-	JRoot;
pro-	JRoot;
proto-	JRoot;
pseudo-	JRoot;
psico-	JRoot;
pterigo-	JRoot;
quimio-	JRoot;
radio-	JRoot;
re-	JRoot;
recto-	JRoot;
requete-	JRoot;
retro-	JRoot;
rino-	JRoot;
sacro-	JRoot;
semi-	JRoot;
sero-	JRoot;
seudo-	JRoot;
sico-	JRoot;
sindio-	JRoot;
so-	JRoot;
sobre-	JRoot;
socio-	JRoot;
sub-	JRoot;
sud-	JRoot;
super-	JRoot;
supero-	JRoot;
supra-	JRoot;
sur-	JRoot;
talamo-	JRoot;
tardo-	JRoot;
tecno-	JRoot;
tele-	JRoot;
termo-	JRoot;
tetra-	JRoot;
tibio-	JRoot;
tiro-	JRoot;
toraco-	JRoot;
trans-	JRoot;
traqueo-	JRoot;
tras-	JRoot;
tri-	JRoot;
ultra-	JRoot;
uni-	JRoot;
uro-	JRoot;
utero-	JRoot;
vesico-	JRoot;
vestibulo-	JRoot;
vice-	JRoot;
visco-	JRoot;
ítalo-	JRoot;
